Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4718.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.29, is amended to read: 168.29 REPLACEMENT PLATES. (a) In the event of the defacement,new text begin failure,new text end loss, or destruction of any deleted text begin numberdeleted text end new text begin licensenew text end plates or validation stickers, the commissionerdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin must issue a new set of plates or stickersnew text end upon receiving deleted text begin and filingdeleted text end new text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end a sworn statement of the vehicle owner, setting forth the circumstances of the defacement,new text begin failure,new text end loss, destruction, or theft deleted text begin of the number plates or validation stickers, together withdeleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2)new text end any deleted text begin defaceddeleted text end new text begin availablenew text end plates or stickersnew text begin being replacednew text end new text begin ;new text end and deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin (3)new text end payment of a fee calculated to cover the cost of replacement, deleted text begin must issue a new set of plates or stickersdeleted text end new text begin subject to paragraph (c)new text end . (b) A licensed motor vehicle dealer may only apply for replacement plates upon application for a certificate of title in the name of a new owner or the dealer. The commissioner must issue a new set of plates or validation stickers upon application for title and registration after removal of plates pursuant to section 168A.11, subdivision 2. (c) Plates issued under this section are subject to section 168.12new text begin . The commissioner must not impose a fee for replacement of a license plate or validation sticker that is defective or fails to perform its function other than through normal wear and tear or damage sustained after issuance.new text end (d) The commissioner must note on the commissioner's records the issue of new deleted text begin numberdeleted text end plates and must attempt to cancel and call in the original plates so as to insure against their use on another motor vehicle. (e) Duplicate registration certificates plainly marked as duplicates may be issued in like cases upon the payment of a $1 fee. Fees collected under this section must be deposited in the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.33, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Filing fees; allocations. (a) In addition to all other statutory fees and taxes: (1) an $8 filing fee is imposed on every vehicle registration renewal, excluding pro rate transactions; and (2) a $12 filing fee is imposed on every other type of vehicle transaction, including motor carrier fuel licenses under sections 168D.05 and 168D.06, and pro rate transactions. (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a): (1) a filing fee may not be charged fornew text begin :new text end new text begin (i)new text end a document returned for a refundnew text begin ;new text end new text begin (ii) issuance of a replacement license plate or validation sticker that is defective or fails to perform its function other than through normal wear and tear or damage sustained after issuance;new text end or deleted text begin fordeleted text end new text begin (iii)new text end a correction of an error made by the Department of Public Safety, a dealer, or a deputy registrar; and (2) no filing fee or other fee may be charged for the permanent surrender of a title for a vehicle. (c) The filing fee must be shown as a separate item on all registration renewal notices sent out by the commissioner. (d) The statutory fees and taxes, the filing fees imposed under paragraph (a), and the surcharge imposed under paragraph (f) may be paid by credit card or debit card. The deputy registrar may collect a surcharge on the payment made under this paragraph not greater than the cost of processing a credit card or debit card transaction, in accordance with emergency rules established by the commissioner of public safety. The surcharge authorized by this paragraph must be used to pay the cost of processing credit and debit card transactions. (e) The fees collected under paragraph (a) by the department must be allocated as follows: (1) of the fees collected under paragraph (a), clause (1): (i) $6.50 must be deposited in the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1; and (ii) $1.50 must be deposited in the driver and vehicle services technology account under section 299A.705, subdivision 3; and (2) of the fees collected under paragraph (a), clause (2): (i) $3.50 must be deposited in the general fund; (ii) $7 must be deposited in the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1; and (iii) $1.50 must be deposited in the driver and vehicle services technology account under section 299A.705, subdivision 3. (f) In addition to all other statutory fees and taxes, a deputy registrar must assess a $1 surcharge on every transaction for which filing fees are collected under this subdivision. The surcharge authorized by this paragraph must be (1) deposited in the treasury of the place for which the deputy registrar is appointed, or (2) if the deputy registrar is not a public official, retained by the deputy registrar. For purposes of this paragraph, a deputy registrar does not include the commissioner. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end